Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
FUND FOR STUDENT SUCCESS
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 2. Fund for Student Success; transfers to accounts. (1) The Fund for Student
Success is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Fund  for Student Success shall consist of moneys appropriated by the Legislative
Assembly, moneys transferred to the fund under section 76  of this 2019 Act and moneys re-
ceived as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The Department of Education, on behalf of  the State of Oregon, may solicit and ac-
cept gifts, grants, donations and other moneys from public  and private sources for the Fund
for Student Success. Moneys received as provided in  this subsection shall be deposited into
the Fund for Student Success.
(4) Moneys in the Fund for  Student Success are continuously appropriated to the de-
partment for:
(a) Transfer to the State School Fund in the amount calculated by the Legislative  Fiscal
Officer and the Legislative Revenue Officer to be the sum of:
(A) At least $40 million, for the purpose of a transfer under  ORS 327.008 (11) to the High
Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348; and
(B) The amount  of change in General Fund revenue to be collected in the biennium due
to the amendments to ORS 316.037 by section 56 of  this 2019 Act and the operation of
sections 58 to 76 of this 2019 Act.
(b) Of  the amount remaining in the Fund for Student Success after the transfer pre-
scribed by paragraph (a) of this subsection, transfer to other education accounts as follows:
(A) At  least 50 percent to the Student Investment Account established in section 8 of this
2019 Act.
(B) Up to 30 percent to the Statewide Education Initiatives Account  established in sec-
tion 24 of this 2019 Act.
(C) At least 20 percent to the Early Learning Account established in  section 51 of this
2019 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 1
SECTION 3. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of the transfer under section 2  of this 2019
Act,  for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, the Department of Education shall transfer
from the Fund for Student Success to the State School Fund an  amount that equals $200
million.
(2) Notwithstanding section 2 (4)(a) of this 2019 Act,  for the biennium beginning July 1,
2019, the amount the Department of Education shall transfer  from the Fund for Student
Success to  the State School Fund for the purpose of a transfer under ORS 327.008 (11) to the
High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348 shall be $20 million.
STATE SCHOOL FUND
SECTION 4.  ORS 327.008, as amended by section 22, chapter 639,  Oregon Laws 2017, and sec-
tion 5, chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on  behalf of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public  and private sources for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State  School Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Fund for Student Success, moneys transferred from the  Education
Stability Fund  and the Oregon Marijuana Account and moneys received as provided in paragraph
(b) of this subsection.
(d) The State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to  327.077, 327.095, 327.099, 327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961 and sections 1 to 3, chapter 735, Oregon Laws
2013.
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each  school district a State School
Fund grant, consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a facility  grant
and a transportation grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue,  computed as
provided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
(3) For the first school year  after a public charter school ceases to operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of termination or nonrenewal of  a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to each school district that had sponsored a  public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount  equal to the school district’s general purpose grant per extended
ADMw  multiplied  by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each  education service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All figures  used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in  average daily membership used in the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district  may not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount of the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants  may not ex-
ceed $7 million in any biennium.  If the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the Department of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available  for facility
grants among those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does  not exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from the  State School Fund no
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125  (2)
to (6).
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 2
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of  Education shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility  Account  established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount  of $35 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each  biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $39.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Educator Advancement Fund established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The  total amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school  districts from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education  service districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $16.75 million.
(c) For each biennium, the amounts identified in this subsection shall be adjusted  by the same
percentage by which the instructions furnished to state agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204
direct the state agencies to adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under  ORS
291.216 (6)(a)(C).
(13) Each  biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English Language  Learner Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each fiscal  year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the State
School Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this section  and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education  may expend up to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide  administration of and support for the development of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education  may expend up to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration of a program to  increase the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
(17) Each fiscal year,  the Department of Education shall transfer the amount of $2.5 million from
the State School Fund to the Small School District Supplement Fund  established in section 3,
chapter 735, Oregon Laws 2013.
(18) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $2 million  from the State School
Fund for deposit to the Healthy School Facilities Fund established under ORS 332.337.
Notwithstanding ORS 332.337,  the department may expend moneys received in the Healthy School
Facilities Fund under this subsection only as grants for costs associated with testing  for elevated
levels of lead in water used for drinking or food preparation.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 327.008, as amended by section 7, chapter 735,  Oregon Laws 2013, section 7,
chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2014, section 2, chapter 68, Oregon Laws  2015, section 38, chapter 245,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 2, chapter 555, Oregon  Laws 2015, section 11, chapter 604, Oregon Laws
2015, section 2, chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2015, section 8, chapter 783, Oregon Laws 2015,  sections
22 and 23, chapter 639, Oregon Laws 2017, sections 5 and 6, chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2017,  and
section 34, chapter 725, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on  behalf of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public  and private sources for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State  School Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Fund for Student Success,  moneys transferred from the  Education
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 3
Stability Fund  and the Oregon Marijuana Account and moneys received as provided in paragraph
(b) of this subsection.
(d) The State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to  327.077, 327.095, 327.099, 327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961.
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each  school district a State School
Fund grant, consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a facility  grant
and a transportation grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue,  computed as
provided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
(3) For the first school year  after a public charter school ceases to operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of termination or nonrenewal of  a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to each school district that had sponsored a  public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount  equal to the school district’s general purpose grant per extended
ADMw  multiplied  by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each  education service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All figures  used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in  average daily membership used in the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district  may not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount of the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants  may not ex-
ceed $7 million in any biennium.  If the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the Department of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available  for facility
grants among those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does  not exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from the  State School Fund no
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125  (2)
to (6).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of  Education shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility  Account  established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer  the amount of [ $35] $55 million
from the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each  biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $39.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Educator Advancement Fund established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The  total amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school  districts from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education  service districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $16.75 million.
(c) For each biennium, the amounts identified in this subsection shall be adjusted  by the same
percentage by which the instructions furnished to state agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204
direct the state agencies to adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under  ORS
291.216 (6)(a)(C).
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 4
(13) Each  biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English Language  Learner Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from  the State
School Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this section  and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend  up to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration of and support for the development of  talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend  up to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration of  a program to increase the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
(17) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $2 million  from the State School
Fund for deposit to the Healthy School Facilities Fund established under ORS 332.337.
Notwithstanding ORS 332.337,  the department may expend moneys received in the Healthy School
Facilities Fund under this subsection only as grants for costs associated with testing  for elevated
levels of lead in water used for drinking or food preparation.
SECTION 6.
(1) The amendments to ORS 327.008 by section 5 of  this 2019 Act become
operative on July 1, 2020.
(2) The amendments to ORS 327.008 by section 5 of this 2019 Act apply to State  School
Fund distributions commencing with the 2020-2021 distributions.
STUDENT INVESTMENT ACCOUNT
SECTION 7. Sections 8 to 19 of this 2019 Act are added to and made a part of  ORS
chapter 327.
SECTION 8. Student Investment Account.  (1) The Student Investment Account is estab-
lished within the Fund for Student Success.
(2) The Student Investment Account shall consist of:
(a) Moneys transferred to the account from the Fund for Student Success;
(b) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the  account by the Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Amounts donated to the account; and
(d) Other amounts deposited into the account from any source.
(3) The Department of Education, on behalf of the  State of Oregon, may solicit and ac-
cept gifts, grants, donations and other moneys from public  and private sources for the Stu-
dent Investment Account. Moneys received as provided  in this subsection shall be deposited
into the Student Investment Account.
(4) Moneys  in the Student Investment Account are continuously appropriated to the De-
partment of Education for the purposes of distributing grants  under section 13 of this 2019
Act.
SECTION 9.
Allowed uses of grants from Student Investment Account.  (1) In addition to
those moneys distributed through the  State School Fund, the Department of Education shall
award grants from the Student Investment Account. Grants shall be distributed as  provided
under section 13 of this 2019 Act.
(2) The purposes of grants distributed under section 13 of this 2019 Act shall be to:
(a) Meet students’ mental or behavioral health needs; and
(b) Increase academic achievement for  students, including reducing academic disparities
for:
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 5
(A) Economically disadvantaged students, as determined  based on eligibility for free or
reduced price lunches under the United States  Department of Agriculture’s current Income
Eligibility Guidelines;
(B) Students from racial or ethnic groups that  have historically experienced academic
disparities, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(C) Students with disabilities;
(D) Students who are English language learners;
(E) Students who are foster children, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(F) Students who are homeless, as determined under rules  adopted by the State Board
of Education; and
(G) Any  other student groups that have historically experienced academic disparities, as
determined by the State Board of Education by rule.
(3) Grant moneys received  under section 13 of this 2019 Act may be used by a grant re-
cipient only for:
(a) Increasing instructional time, which may include:
(A) More hours or days of instructional time;
(B) Summer programs;
(C) Before-school or after-school programs; or
(D) Technological investments that minimize class time used for assessments  adminis-
tered to students.
(b) Addressing students’ health or safety needs, which may include:
(A) Social-emotional learning and development;
(B) Student mental and behavioral health;
(C) Improvements to teaching and learning practices or organizational structures  that
lead to better interpersonal relationships at the school;
(D) Student health and wellness;
(E) Trauma-informed practices;
(F) School health professionals and assistants; or
(G) Facility improvements directly related to improving student health or safety.
(c) Reducing class sizes,  which may include increasing the use of instructional assistants,
by using  evidence-based criteria to ensure appropriate student-teacher ratios or staff
caseloads.
(d) Expanding availability of  and student participation in well-rounded learning experi-
ences, which may include:
(A) Developmentally appropriate and  culturally responsive early literacy practices and
programs in prekindergarten through third grade;
(B) Culturally responsive  practices and programs in grades six through eight, including
learning, counseling and student support that is connected to colleges and careers;
(C) Broadened curricular options at all grade levels, including access to:
(i) Art, music and physical education classes;
(ii) Science, technology, engineering and mathematics education;
(iii) Career and technical education, including career and technical student organization
programs;
(iv) Electives that are engaging to students;
(v) Accelerated college credit programs, including dual credit programs, International
Baccalaureate programs and advanced placement programs;
(vi) Dropout prevention programs and transition supports;
(vii) Life skills classes; or
(viii) Talented and gifted programs; or
(D) Access to licensed educators with a library media endorsement.
SECTION 10.
Application requirements to receive grants from  Student Investment Ac-
count. (1) As used in this section, “eligible applicant” means:
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 6
(a) Common school districts and union high school districts; and
(b) Public charter schools that are not virtual public charter  schools, as defined in ORS
338.005, and that have a student population of which:
(A) At least 35 percent of the  student population is composed of students from the fol-
lowing student groups:
(i) Economically disadvantaged, as described in section 9 (2)(b)(A) of this 2019 Act;
(ii) Racial or ethnic groups that have historically experienced academic disparities, as
described in section 9 (2)(b)(B) of this 2019 Act; or
(iii) Students with disabilities, as described in section 9 (2)(b)(C) of this 2019 Act; and
(B) The percentage of the  students from student groups identified under subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph is greater than:
(i) The percentage of all students in the school district  who are economically disadvan-
taged, if eligibility is determined based on the percentage of students who  are economically
disadvantaged;
(ii) The percentage of all students in the school district who  are from racial or ethnic
groups that have historically experienced academic disparities,  if eligibility is determined
based on the percentage of students who are from those racial or ethnic groups; or
(iii) The percentage of all students in the school district who are disabled, if eligibility  is
determined based on the percentage of students who are disabled.
(2)(a) Eligible applicants may apply for a grant from the Student Investment Account to
receive a distribution under section 12 of this 2019 Act.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 338.155 (9), a public charter school that is  not an eligible appli-
cant may not apply for a grant under this section.
(3) Prior to preparing a grant application, an eligible applicant must:
(a) If the eligible  applicant is a school district, determine whether the school district will
allow public charter schools sponsored by the school district to participate in the grant ap-
plication and the grant agreement.
(b) If the eligible applicant is a public charter school,  determine whether the public
charter school intends to  apply for a grant and provide notice of that intent to the school
district that  is the sponsor of the public charter school and to the Department of Education.
(4)(a) If an eligible applicant is a school district and decides to include public charter
schools in  the grant application and grant agreement, the school district must provide all
public charter schools sponsored by the  school district the opportunity to participate in the
grant application and grant agreement.
(b)(A) A public charter school is  not required to participate in the grant application and
grant agreement of a school district.
(B) If  a public charter school does not participate in a grant application and grant
agreement under this subsection:
(i) The ADMw of the public charter school may not be used in the calculation of the
school district ADMw for grants distributed under section 13 of this 2019 Act; and
(ii) The public charter school is  not entitled to any grant moneys distributed under sec-
tion 13 of this 2019 Act.
(C) If a public charter school participates in a grant application and  grant agreement
under this subsection:
(i) The public charter school and school district shall enter into an agreement for the
distribution of moneys or  the provision of services, including any accountability measures
required of the public charter school by the school district;
(ii) The ADMw of the public charter school shall be used in the calculation of the  school
district ADMw for grants distributed under section 13 of this 2019 Act; and
(iii) The public charter school is entitled to  any grant moneys or services provided for in
the agreement entered into under this subparagraph.
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 7
(5)(a) For the purpose of preparing a  grant application, an eligible applicant must deter-
mine:
(A) Which of  the allowed uses identified in section 9 (3) of this 2019 Act the eligible ap-
plicant will fund with grant moneys; and
(B) Which of the eligible uses identified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph  the
eligible applicant will designate to meeting student mental and behavioral health needs.
(b) An eligible applicant shall make the determinations required  under paragraph (a) of
this subsection by:
(A) Engaging in strategic planning; and
(B) Considering the recommendations of the Quality Education  Commission established
under ORS 327.500.
(6)(a) The strategic planning required under subsection (5) of this section must include:
(A) A completed needs assessment, as described in ORS 329.095;
(B) An  analysis of the potential academic impact, both for the students of the eligible
applicant and for student groups  identified in section 9 (2)(b) of this 2019 Act, from the al-
lowed uses that would be funded by grant moneys; and
(C) The creation of budgets for the allowed uses that would be funded by grant moneys.
(b) The strategic planning required under subsection (5)  of this section must take into
consideration:
(A) Input from the community of the eligible  applicant, including school employees, stu-
dents from student groups identified in section 9 (2)(b) of this 2019 Act and parents of  those
students; and
(B) Data collected by the eligible  applicant to enable the eligible applicant to make
equity-based decisions.
(7) Based on the strategic planning described in subsection (6) of this section, the  eligible
applicant shall develop a four-year plan for the use of grant  moneys. The plan must be up-
dated every two years and must:
(a) Identify which allowed uses  identified in section 9 (3) of this 2019 Act will be funded
with grant moneys  and which of those uses will be designated to meet student mental and
behavioral health needs.
(b) Describe how the allowed uses identified under paragraph (a) of  this subsection will
be used to:
(A) Meet students’ mental and behavioral health needs;
(B) Increase academic achievement for students of the eligible applicant; and
(C) Reduce academic disparities  for student groups identified in section 9 (2)(b) of this
2019 Act who are served by the  eligible applicant, and identify which of those student groups
will benefit from the allowed uses that are being funded with grant moneys.
(c) Include the budgets for the allowed uses to be funded with grant moneys.
(d) Be approved by the governing body  of the eligible applicant at an open meeting, fol-
lowing:
(A) Provision of the plan at the main office of the eligible applicant and on the eligible
applicant’s website;
(B) Oral presentation of the plan by an administrator of the  eligible applicant to the
governing body of the eligible applicant; and
(C) Opportunity for the public to comment on the plan at an open meeting.
(e) Be a part of the local district  continuous improvement plan described in ORS 329.095,
if the eligible applicant is a school district.
(8) To  apply for a grant, an eligible applicant must submit an application every two years
in a format  and according to timelines prescribed by the Department of Education. The ap-
plication must include:
(a) A completed needs assessment, as described in ORS 329.095;
(b) The plan developed under subsection (7) of this section; and
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 8
(c) Budget estimates for each of the allowed uses identified in the plan developed under
subsection (7) of this section that will be funded by grant moneys.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding section 10 of this 2019 Act, any plans submitted for a grant
from the Student Investment  Account to be used before the 2021-2023 biennium must be for
a three-year plan and must be updated after the first year.
SECTION 12. Approval of applications to receive grants  from the Student Investment
Account; performance growth targets.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Disaggregated” means separated based on the  student groups identified in section 9
(2)(b) of this 2019 Act.
(b) “Five-year completion  rate” means the percentage of students who received a high
school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended  diploma or who received a certificate for
passing an approved high school equivalency test such as the General  Educational Develop-
ment test (GED) within five years of the student beginning the ninth grade.
(c) “High school diploma” means a  diploma that is awarded to a student upon satisfaction
of the requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2).
(d) “Ninth-grade on-track rates” means  the percentage of students who, at the end of the
summer following the year the students began ninth grade, completed  one quarter of the
credits required for high school graduation.
(e) “On-time graduation rate”  means the percentage of students who received a high
school diploma or a  modified diploma within four years of the students beginning the ninth
grade.
(f) “Regular attendance rates” means the percentage of  students who are absent, as de-
termined by Department of  Education policy, for less than 10 percent of the school days for
which the students are enrolled.
(g) “Third-grade reading proficiency rate” means the percentage of students in the  third
grade who are determined to be proficient or above in  English language arts, as determined
under rules adopted by the State Board of Education.
(2) The Department of Education  shall review all applications for grants from the Stu-
dent Investment Account  that comply with the requirements prescribed by section 10 of this
2019 Act.
(3) If an application complies with the requirements of  section 10 of this 2019 Act, the
department shall collaborate with the grant recipient to develop applicable longitudinal  per-
formance growth targets. The longitudinal performance growth targets must:
(a) Be based on data available for longitudinal analysis;
(b) Be developed based on guidance established by the department; and
(c) Use the following applicable metrics:
(A) On-time graduation rates and five-year completion rates, including:
(i) The overall on-time graduation rate and five-year completion rate.
(ii) Gaps in disaggregated on-time graduation rates and five-year completion rates.
(B) Ninth-grade on-track rates, including:
(i) The overall ninth-grade on-track rate.
(ii) Gaps in disaggregated ninth-grade on-track rates.
(C) Third-grade reading proficiency rates, including:
(i) The overall third-grade reading proficiency rate.
(ii) Gaps in disaggregated third-grade reading proficiency rates.
(D) Regular attendance rates, including:
(i) The overall regular attendance rate.
(ii) Gaps in disaggregated regular attendance rates.
(4) In addition  to the metrics identified in subsection (3) of this section, other local
metrics may be used to develop applicable performance growth targets.
(5) When developing performance growth targets, the department  and grant recipient
shall:
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 9
(a) Review disaggregated student data;
(b) Apply a process adopted by the department for the  purpose of strategically developing
equitable policies and programs; and
(c) Identify which student  groups identified in section 9 (2)(b) of this 2019 Act are most
at risk of not meeting performance growth targets.
(6)(a) After developing performance growth targets, the department and  grant recipient
shall enter into a grant agreement. The grant agreement must include applicable  perform-
ance growth targets for measuring the academic growth of the students of the grant recipi-
ent.
(b) A grant agreement is  not valid until approved by the governing body of the grant
recipient at an open meeting following:
(A) Provision of the  plan at the main office of the grant recipient and on the grant
recipient’s website;
(B) Oral presentation of the plan by an administrator of the grant recipient to the gov-
erning body of the grant recipient; and
(C) Opportunity for the public to comment on the plan at an open meeting.
(7) Any agreements between a  public charter school and a grant recipient that is a school
district shall become part of the grant agreement.
SECTION 13.
Calculations of grant amounts; distributions  of grants.  (1)(a) Except as
provided by paragraph (d) of this subsection, the amount of a grant  awarded from the Stu-
dent Investment Account = the  grant recipient’s ADMw ×  (the total amount available for
distribution as grants in each biennium ÷  the total ADMw of all grant recipients).
(b) For  purposes of this subsection and except as provided by paragraph (c) of this sub-
section, ADMw equals the ADMw as calculated under ORS 327.013, except that the additional
amount allowed for students who are in poverty  families, as determined under ORS 327.013
(1)(c)(A)(v)(I), shall be 0.5.
(c) When calculating ADMw, the  Department of Education shall remove from a school
district’s calculation any amounts that are attributable to:
(A) A virtual public charter school, as defined in ORS 338.005;
(B) A  public charter school that provided notice of the public charter school’s intent to
apply for a grant as an eligible applicant; and
(C) A public charter school sponsored by the school  district that did not participate in
the grant application or grant agreement.
(d) The amount of  a grant distributed under this section may be adjusted by the depart-
ment to ensure that:
(A) A grant recipient does not receive any moneys for uses that are  not allowed uses
under section 9 (3) of this 2019 Act.
(B) A school district with an ADMw of 50 or less receives a minimum grant amount.
(2) The State Board of Education shall adopt any rules necessary for  the distribution of
grants under this section, including establishing:
(a) The minimum grant amounts under subsection (1)(d) of this section; and
(b) Any  percentages and timelines for installment payments and adjustments of those
installment payments.
(3) A grant recipient shall deposit the grant moneys the grant recipient  receives under
this section into a separate account and shall apply amounts in that account  as provided by
the grant agreement.
SECTION 14.
The Department of Education shall establish  timelines that allow for the
first distributions to be made under section 13 of this  2019 Act for the 2020-2021 school year.
SECTION 15. Financial audits; determinations of moneys not spent in accordance with
grant agreement or failure to meet performance growth  targets.  (1)(a) Each year, each re-
cipient of a grant from the Student Investment Account shall:
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 10
(A) Conduct a financial audit of the use  of grant moneys that is prepared in accordance
with the Municipal Audit Law; and
(B) Review the  grant recipient’s progress toward meeting the performance growth tar-
gets in the grant agreement.
(b) Results of the financial audit and progress review must be:
(A) Made available at the main office of the grant  recipient and on the grant recipient’s
website.
(B) Presented to the governing body of the grant recipient at an open meeting, following:
(i) Oral presentation of the results by an administrator of  the grant recipient to the
governing body of the grant recipient; and
(ii) Opportunity for the public to comment on the results at an open meeting.
(C) Forwarded to the Department of Education.
(2)(a) Based on information received  under subsection (1) of this section, the department
shall determine each year whether grant moneys received by a grant recipient were used as
provided by the grant agreement.
(b) If a grant recipient did not use grant  moneys as provided by the grant agreement, the
department shall:
(A) Collaborate with the grant  recipient to identify and implement specific interventions;
(B) Provide technical  assistance to the grant recipient as described in section 16 of this
2019 Act; or
(C) Deduct amounts from future grant distributions.
(c) If amounts are  to be deducted from future grant distributions under paragraph (b)(C)
of this subsection, the grant recipient may appeal to the  State Board of Education for review
as provided by the board by rule.
(d) If a grant recipient fails to commit to spending  all available grant moneys, the de-
partment may deduct amounts not committed from future grant distributions.
(3)(a) The department shall determine each biennium if a grant recipient does not meet
performance growth targets identified in the grant agreement.
(b) If a grant recipient does not meet the performance growth targets:
(A) The grant recipient may submit an  explanation for the reasons why the performance
growth targets were not met; and
(B) The department may:
(i) Take into consideration the explanation submitted by the grant recipient;
(ii) Require the grant recipient to enter  into a coaching program described in section 17
of this 2019 Act; or
(iii) Direct the expenditure of grant moneys.
(4) Each grant recipient must conduct a performance review every  four years, as re-
quired by standards adopted by the board by rule.
(5)(a) Based on a review of the information received under subsection (1)  of this section,
the department may require a grant recipient to conduct a  financial audit on a specific
funding area or multiple funding areas.
(b) The department may establish a  procedure for conducting performance audits on a
random basis or based on just cause as allowed under rules adopted by the board.
SECTION 16.
Technical assistance provided by the Department  of Education. (1) The
Department of Education shall make available technical assistance to eligible applicants,  as
defined in section 10 of this 2019 Act, and to recipients of a grant from  the Student Invest-
ment Account. The technical assistance shall include the provision of assistance with:
(a) Strategic planning for the use of grant moneys;
(b) Developing an application for a grant from the Student Investment Account;
(c) Identifying and implementing best  practices for meeting performance growth targets;
and
(d) Identifying and implementing promising practices related to a grant agreement.
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 11
(2) When providing technical assistance, the department shall:
(a) Apply a process adopted  by the department to strategically develop equitable policies
and programs; and
(b) Ensure that technical assistance is based on the  eligible applicant’s or grant
recipient’s specific needs and demographics.
(3) For the purpose of providing technical  assistance under this section, the department
may enter  into contracts with entities the department determines are qualified to provide
the technical assistance.
SECTION 17.
Coaching program for grant recipients that do not meet  performance
growth targets.  (1) The Department of Education shall establish  a coaching program for re-
cipients of a grant from the Student Investment Account that do not meet  the performance
growth targets specified in their grant agreements. A  public charter school may participate
in the coaching program only if the public charter school received a grant directly from  the
department and did not meet the performance growth targets  specified in the public charter
school’s grant agreement.
(2) If  required by the department under section 15 of this 2019 Act to participate in a
coaching program, a grant recipient  must participate in the coaching program. Participation
in the coaching program must be for at least one  year, unless the department allows for a
shorter period of time. Under  the program, the department shall advise and counsel grant
recipients on how to meet  performance growth targets and shall assist grant recipients with
ongoing professional development and peer collaboration.
(3) After a grant recipient has  completed the coaching program, the department shall
make available to the grant recipient ongoing technical assistance as described in  section 16
of this 2019 Act.
(4) For the purpose of providing the coaching program under this section, the department
may enter into contracts with entities the department determines are qualified to  provide
the coaching.
SECTION 18. Intensive program for high needs school  districts.  (1) The Department of
Education shall establish an intensive program for school districts  with the highest needs in
this state.
(2)(a) The department shall identify and select  school districts to participate in the in-
tensive program. The department may not select a public charter school under this section.
(b) A school district that agrees  to participate in the intensive program must participate
in the program for at least four years.
(3) A school  district that agrees to participate in the intensive program shall be eligible
for additional funding from the Statewide Education Initiatives  Account. The additional
funding shall be based on rules adopted by the State  Board of Education and shall be calcu-
lated based on the ADMw of the school district, as calculated  under section 13 of this 2019
Act.
(4) A school district that agrees to participate in the intensive program shall:
(a) Commit to regular student success plan meetings to monitor practices;
(b) Use data to track student progress;
(c) Ensure school employees receive appropriate professional development and training;
(d) Create safe and inclusive learning environments;
(e) Improve school and school district practices and structures to  support teaching and
learning; and
(f) Improve the skills of the members of the school board.
(5) For the purpose  of assisting school districts participating in the intensive program,
the department shall establish student success teams. Student success teams shall be com-
posed of personnel with  expertise in school and school district improvement strategies, in-
cluding the use of differentiated instruction and inclusionary practices.
(6)(a) Under the intensive program, student success teams shall:
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 12
(A) Advise and counsel school districts on how to improve performance outcomes; and
(B) Develop recommendations for meeting performance growth targets.
(b) School district boards and superintendents of school  districts participating in an in-
tensive program must:
(A) Accept all recommendations of the student success  teams related to the use of Stu-
dent Investment Account grant moneys and additional funding received under  this section;
and
(B) Consider all recommendations of the student success teams not described in subpar-
agraph (A) of this paragraph.
(c) A school district that receives recommendations under this  subsection must issue a
report that:
(A) Describes the recommendations;
(B) Identifies the recommendations that will be implemented  and the timelines for im-
plementing the recommendations; and
(C) Identifies the recommendations  that will not be implemented and an explanation for
why the recommendations will not be implemented.
(d) The report required under paragraph (c) of this subsection must be:
(A) Made available at the school  district’s main office and on the school district’s
website; and
(B) Distributed to the school district community, including employees of the school  dis-
trict and families of the students of the school district.
SECTION 19.
Reports to the Legislative Assembly.  The Department of Education shall
make a report to the committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to education no later
than February 1 of each year regarding the implementation of sections 8  to 19 of this 2019
Act. The report must  include an annual performance review of each eligible applicant, as
defined in section 10 of this 2019 Act. The report must:
(1) Identify whether the eligible applicant  received a grant under sections 8 to 19 of this
2019 Act.
(2) For grant recipients, include a comparison of  the grant recipient’s progress toward
meeting performance growth targets compared with the actual performance  growth targets
established by the department for the following:
(a) On-time  graduation rates and five-year completion rates, including the overall rate
and disaggregated student group rates;
(b) Ninth-grade on-track rates, including the overall  rate and disaggregated student
group rates;
(c) Third-grade reading proficiency rates, including the  overall rate and disaggregated
student group rates;
(d) Regular attendance rates, including the overall rate and disaggregated student group
rates; and
(e) Any optional local metrics.
SECTION 20.
The Department of Education must make the first report required under
section 19 of this 2019 Act no later than February 1, 2022.
SECTION 21.  ORS 329.095 is amended to read:
329.095. (1)(a) The Department of Education  shall require school districts and schools to conduct
self-evaluations and to periodically update their local district continuous improvement plans. Except
as provided by paragraph (b)(C) of this subsection,  the department may not require school districts
or schools to conduct self-evaluations or to update their local  district continuous improvement plans
more frequently than biennially.
(b) The department may require a school district to:
(A) File,  periodically, or at the department’s request, its local district continuous improvement
plan with the department;
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 13
(B) Notify the department of any substantial changes, as defined by rule of the State Board  of
Education, to the school district; or
(C) Update its local  district continuous improvement plan when there has been a substantial
change, as defined by rule of the board, to the school district.
(c) The self-evaluation process  conducted as provided by this subsection shall involve the public
in the setting of local goals. The school districts shall ensure that representatives from the demo-
graphic  groups  of their school population are invited to participate in the development of local dis-
trict continuous improvement plans to achieve the goals.
(2) As part of setting local goals, school districts shall  undertake a communications process that
involves parents, students, teachers, school  employees and community representatives to explain and
discuss the local goals and their relationship to programs under this chapter.
(3) At the request of the school district, department staff shall provide ongoing  technical as-
sistance in the development and implementation of the local district continuous improvement plan.
(4) The local district continuous improvement plan shall include:
(a) Goals to implement the following:
(A) A rigorous curriculum aligned with state standards;
(B) High-quality instructional programs;
(C) Short-term and long-term professional development plans;
(D) Programs and policies that achieve a safe educational environment;
(E) A plan for family and community engagement;
(F) Staff leadership development;
(G) High-quality data systems;
(H) Improvement planning that is data-driven;
(I) Education service plans for students who have or have not exceeded  all of the academic
content standards; and
(J) A strong school library program;
(b) A review of  demographics, student performance, staff characteristics and student access to,
and use of, educational opportunities; [ and]
(c) A description of district efforts to achieve  local efficiencies and efforts to make better use
of resources[ .]; and
(d) A needs assessment, which shall:
(A) Be conducted in a manner that is inclusive of school employees, students  from stu-
dent groups identified in section 9 (2)(b) of this 2019 Act and parents of those students.
(B) Address the following priorities:
(i) Reducing academic disparities for students from student groups identified  in section
9 (2)(b) of this 2019 Act;
(ii) Meeting students’ mental or behavioral health needs;
(iii) Providing equitable access to academic courses across the school district  or public
charter school, with specific emphasis on access by students  from student groups identified
in section 9 (2)(b) of this 2019 Act;
(iv) Allowing teachers and staff to have sufficient time to:
(I) Collaborate with other teachers and staff;
(II) Review data on students’ grades, absences and discipline, based on school  and on
grade level or course; and
(III) Develop strategies to ensure that at-risk students stay on track to graduate; and
(v) Possible partnerships with other organizations, federally recognized Indian tribes,
school districts, education service districts,  regional achievement collaboratives, post-
secondary institutions of education, education  partners or nonprofit programs and
community-based programs that  have demonstrated achievement of positive outcomes in
work with students from student groups identified in section 9 (2)(b) of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 22.
The amendments to ORS 329.095 by section 21  of this 2019 Act become op-
erative on July 1, 2020.
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 14
STATEWIDE EDUCATION INITIATIVES ACCOUNT
SECTION 23. Sections 24 and 25 of this 2019 Act are added to and made a part of  ORS
chapter 327.
SECTION 24. Statewide Education Initiatives Account.  (1)  The Statewide Education Ini-
tiatives Account is established within the Fund for Student Success.
(2) The Statewide Education Initiatives Account shall consist of:
(a) Moneys transferred to the account from the Fund for Student Success;
(b) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the  account by the Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Amounts donated to the account; and
(d) Other amounts deposited into the account from any source.
(3) The Department of Education, on behalf of the  State of Oregon, may solicit and ac-
cept gifts, grants, donations and other moneys from public and  private sources for the
Statewide Education Initiatives Account. Moneys received as provided  in this subsection
shall be deposited into the account.
(4) Moneys in the Statewide  Education Initiatives Account are continuously appropriated
to the Department of Education for use as described in section 25 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 25.
Statewide Education Initiatives Account uses.  (1)  The Department of Edu-
cation shall use moneys in the Statewide  Education Initiatives Account to provide funding
for statewide education initiatives, including:
(a) Funding the High School Graduation and College and Career Readiness Act at  the
levels prescribed by ORS 327.856;
(b) Expanding school breakfast and lunch programs;
(c) Operating youth reengagement programs or providing youth reengagement services;
(d) Establishing and maintaining the Statewide School Safety and Prevention System
under section 36 of this 2019 Act;
(e) Developing and providing statewide equity initiatives, including the  black or African-
American education plan developed under ORS 329.841, the  American Indian or Alaskan Na-
tive education plan developed under section 38 of this 2019  Act, the Latino or Hispanic
education plan developed under section 39  of this 2019 Act or any similar education plan
identified by the department;
(f) Providing summer learning programs at schools that are considered  high poverty
under Title I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965;
(g) Funding early warning systems to assist students in graduating from  high school, as
described in section 46 of this 2019 Act;
(h) Developing and implementing professional development programs and training  pro-
grams, including programs that increase educator diversity and retain diverse educators;
(i) Planning for increased transparency and accountability in the  public education system
of this state;
(j) Providing additional funding to school districts participating in the intensive program
under section 18 of this 2019 Act;
(k) Providing technical assistance, including costs incurred for:
(A) The coaching program described in section 17 of this 2019 Act; and
(B) The intensive program described in section 18 of this 2019 Act, including costs  for
student success teams;
(L) Funding education service districts, as described in subsection (2) of this section; and
(m) Funding costs incurred by the department in implementing this  section and sections
8 to 19 and 52 of this 2019 Act.
(2)(a) The amount  of a distribution to an education service district under this section =
the education service district’s ADMw 
×  (the total amount available for distribution to ed-
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 15
ucation service districts in each biennium ÷  the total ADMw of all  education service dis-
tricts that receive a distribution).
(b) For purposes of this subsection, ADMw equals the  ADMw as calculated under ORS
327.013, except that the additional  amount allowed for students who are in poverty families,
as determined under ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A)(v)(I), shall be 0.5.
(c) An education service district shall use  moneys received under this section as provided
by a plan developed by the school  districts located within the education service district. A
school district that declines to participate in the development of the plan or that  has with-
drawn from  an education service district as provided by ORS 334.015 is not entitled to any
moneys distributed to the education service district under this subsection.
(d) A plan developed under this subsection must:
(A) Align with and support school districts in meeting the performance  growth targets
of the school districts developing the plan;
(B) Include the provision of technical assistance  to school districts in developing, imple-
menting and reviewing a plan for receiving a grant from the Student Investment Account;
(C) Provide for coordination with  the department in administering and providing techni-
cal assistance to  school districts, including coordinating any coaching programs established
under section 17 of this 2019 Act; and
(D) Be adopted and amended as provided for local service plans under  ORS 334.175 and
approved by the department.
(e) Each education service district must submit  an annual report to the department that:
(A) Describes how the education service district spent  moneys received under this sub-
section; and
(B) Includes an evaluation of the education service district’s compliance with the plan
from the superintendent of each  school district that participated in the development of the
plan.
(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules necessary for the  distribution of
moneys under this section.
SCHOOL BREAKFAST AND LUNCH PROGRAMS
SECTION 26.
 ORS 327.535 is amended to read:
327.535. (1) As  used in this section, “eligible student” means a student who is eligible for
free or reduced price lunches under the United States Department of Agriculture’s  current
Income Eligibility Guidelines.
[(1)] (2) A school district may make breakfast accessible at  any school site and shall make
breakfast accessible if  required by this section. [ Time spent by students consuming breakfast is con-
sidered instructional time when students  consume breakfast in the students’ classroom and instruction
is being provided while students are consuming breakfast. No more than 15 minutes may  be considered
instructional time when students are consuming breakfast. ]
[(2)] (3) Subject to subsections [ (3) and] (4) and (5) of this section, a school district that provides
lunch at any school site shall make breakfast accessible as  part of a breakfast program if 25 percent
or more of the students  at the school site are eligible  students  [ for free or reduced price lunches
under the United States Department of Agriculture’s current Income Eligibility Guidelines ] or the
school  site  qualifies for assistance under Chapter I of Title I of the federal Elementary and Sec-
ondary Education Act of 1965.
[(3)] (4) A school  district that makes breakfast accessible as provided under subsection [ (2)] (3)
of this section may apply to the [ State Board ] Department of Education for a waiver for all or for
particular grade levels if [ it] the school district  is financially unable  to implement a breakfast
program. The [ state board ] department may grant a waiver to the school district for a period not
to exceed two years, after which the school district must reestablish its claim of financial  hardship
if the waiver is to be extended.
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 16
[(4)] (5) If  the per meal federal reimbursement for the breakfast program falls below the 1991
reimbursement levels, a school  district may elect to discontinue the program until federal funding
is restored to those levels. No waiver is required for such election.
[(5)] (6) A  school district that makes breakfast accessible at any school site shall make breakfast
accessible at that school site at no charge to all eligible students [ who are eligible for free or  re-
duced price lunches under the United States Department of  Agriculture’s current Income Eligibility
Guidelines]. For each breakfast that a school  district provides free of charge to a student who is
eligible for a reduced price lunch, the  department [ of Education ] shall provide reimbursement to the
school district for the actual  amount that a student would have been required to pay for the reduced
price breakfast.
(7)(a) Except  as provided by subsection (8) of this section, a school district that makes
breakfast accessible at a school site may choose to make  breakfast accessible at that school
site after the beginning of the school day.
(b) Time spent by students consuming breakfast is considered instructional time  when
students consume breakfast in the students’ classroom and instruction is being  provided
while students are consuming breakfast. No more than 15 minutes may  be considered in-
structional time when students are consuming breakfast.
(8)(a) If 70 percent or more of  the students at a school site are eligible students, the
school district must make breakfast accessible at that school site after the beginning of  the
school day.
(b) A school district that is required to make breakfast accessible as prescribed by  par-
agraph (a) of this subsection must ensure that breakfast is:
(A) Accessible to all students after the beginning of the school  day, regardless of grade
or arrival time; and
(B) Provided free of charge to all students, regardless of  whether a student is an eligible
student.
(c) The department shall provide technical assistance  to school districts to meet the re-
quirements of this subsection. Technical assistance may include the development of break-
fast delivery models.
(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, if a school district  can demonstrate
that 70  percent or more of the eligible students at a school site regularly receive breakfast
at the school site without  the school district complying with paragraph (a) of this subsection,
the school district is not required to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(9) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the implementation
of this section.
SECTION 27. (1) The amendments to ORS 327.535 by section 26 of this 2019  Act become
operative on July 1, 2020.
(2) Notwithstanding the operative date set forth in subsection  (1) of this section, the
Department of Education may take any action before the operative date  set forth in sub-
section (1) of this section that is necessary for the department to exercise, on and after  the
operative date set forth in subsection (1) of this section,  all of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the  department by the amendments to ORS 327.535 by section 26 of this
2019 Act.
SECTION 28.  ORS 327.527 is amended to read:
327.527. (1) The Department  of Education shall reimburse a school district, government agency
or community group five cents for every  breakfast or lunch the district, agency or group serves
during the summer as a part of:
(a) The United States Department of Agriculture’s Summer Food Service Program; or
(b) A summer meals program through an existing national school lunch program.
(2) In addition to the reimbursements provided under  subsection (1) of this section, the Depart-
ment of Education  may award grants to school districts, government agencies and  community
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 17
groups to encourage participation in  a program identified in subsection (1) of this section. Each
grant may not exceed $20,000 and must be used to:
(a) Purchase or upgrade necessary equipment and services required to provide food  service and
meet sanitation requirements;
(b) Make any payment necessary to comply with sanitation requirements that may be required
prior to approval; or
(c) Fund participant outreach activities and materials and  necessary enrichment activities and
materials.
(3) The  department may award grants or enter into contracts to enable school districts
to make breakfast accessible as required under ORS 327.535  (8). Each grant or contract may
not exceed $5,000 per school site and must be used  to purchase or upgrade necessary equip-
ment required to provide breakfast after the beginning of the school day.
[(3)] (4) The department  may enter into a contract with a public or private entity for the pur-
poses of the entity providing:
(a) Technical assistance to applicants for and recipients of grants; and
(b) Administration of the grant program.
[(4)] (5) The State Board of Education may adopt  any rules necessary for the administration of
this section.
SECTION 29.
Section 30 of  this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 30. (1) For school districts with schools that provide United  States Department
of Agriculture  reimbursable meals to students as described in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, the Department of Education shall reimburse the school  districts for costs incurred
by the school districts in providing the meals. The amounts of the reimbursements may  not
exceed the amounts prescribed by subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(2) For schools that offer reimburseable breakfast and lunch free of charge to  all stu-
dents of the school based on the  school’s or school district’s categorical eligibility to provide
reimburseable breakfast and  lunch free of charge without consideration of individual eligi-
bility for free or reduced price  meals, the amount of reimbursements provided under this
section may not exceed the difference between:
(a) The reimbursement rate established by the United States  Department of Agriculture
for reimburseable meals; and
(b) Any amounts otherwise reimbursed or paid by state, federal or other sources.
(3) For schools that are not  eligible to offer reimburseable breakfast and lunch free of
charge as described in subsection (2) of  this section but that provide reimburseable breakfast
or lunch free of charge to students from households with incomes that do not exceed  300
percent of the federal poverty guidelines, the amount of reimbursements provided under this
section may not exceed the difference between:
(a) The actual amount  that a student would have been required to pay for the breakfast
or lunch, taking into consideration if the student qualified for a free  or reduced price lunch;
and
(b) Any amounts otherwise reimbursed or paid by state, federal or other sources.
(4) The State Board of  Education may adopt any rules necessary for making reimburse-
ments under this section.
SECTION 31.
(1) Section 30 of this 2019 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2020.
(2) Section 30 of this 2019 Act applies to costs incurred on or after July 1, 2020.
SECTION 32.
(1) The Hunger Free Schools Account is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) Moneys in the Hunger Free Schools Account are continuously  appropriated to the
Department of Education for the purpose of making reimbursements  to school districts un-
der section 30 of this 2019 Act.
STATEWIDE YOUTH REENGAGEMENT SYSTEM
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 18
SECTION 33. Youth reengagement  program.  (1) As used in this section, “eligible youth”
means a person who:
(a) Is at least 14 years of age but  younger than 21 years of age at the beginning of the
school year; and
(b)(A) Is a school dropout, as defined in ORS 339.505;
(B) Is not exempt from attending public full-time schools under ORS 339.030; or
(C) Is recommended to participate in a youth reengagement program  by the Department
of Human Services, a juvenile court, the Oregon Youth Authority or any  other entity iden-
tified by the Youth Development Council by rule.
(2) The Youth Development Division shall develop and administer  a statewide youth re-
engagement system to provide appropriate  educational opportunities and access to services
for eligible youths.
(3) Under the  statewide youth reengagement system, a school district or other entity
identified by the Youth  Development Council by rule may choose to provide a youth reen-
gagement program. A youth reengagement program must:
(a) Be offered in collaboration with the Youth Development Division; and
(b) Include a partnership with an education  service district, a community college district,
a federally recognized Indian tribe, a community-based  organization or any other entity
identified by the Youth Development Council by rule.
(4) A youth reengagement program must offer, at a minimum, the following:
(a) Academic instruction that enables an eligible youth to receive credit that can be:
(A) Applied toward a high school diploma, a modified diploma or  an extended diploma; or
(B) Used to improve college or career readiness, including courses that assist the eligible
youth in preparing for an approved high school equivalency test such as the General Educa-
tional Development (GED) test; or
(b) Services for monitoring and supporting eligible youths, including:
(A) Academic counseling, career coaching and workforce readiness services; or
(B) Assistance with accessing  services and resources that support at-risk youth and re-
duce barriers to educational success.
(5) If a school district or other entity chooses to provide a youth  reengagement program,
the school district or other entity may enter into an agreement to provide academic  in-
struction or services as described in subsection (4) of this section. The agreement:
(a) May  be with an education service district, a community college district or another
public entity or with a community-based organization; and
(b) Must comply with any other requirements  prescribed by the State Board of Education
or the Youth Development Council by rule.
(6)(a) The State Board of Education,  in collaboration with the Youth Development
Council, shall establish by rule criteria  for a school district or other entity to receive funding
for eligible youths participating in a youth reengagement program. Funding may be in the
form of grants.
(b) The criteria to receive funding may prescribe:
(A) Enrollment and attendance standards for eligible youths.
(B) Performance  measures that establish targets that must be met for purposes of ac-
countability. The performance measure targets shall be based on standards adopted by  the
Youth Development Council and may take into account the specific purpose  of the program
offered by the school district or other entity, the population served by the program and  any
other factors identified by the council.
(c) The criteria to receive funding must require a school district  or other entity to pro-
vide to the Youth Development Division information that, at a minimum, describes:
(A) How the school district or other entity will identify, refer and enroll eligible youths;
(B) How academic instruction and services will be provided through the youth  reengage-
ment program and what academic instruction and services will be provided;
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 19
(C) How student records will be maintained and how data will be collected and reported;
(D) How any applicable assessments under ORS 329.485 or 329.488 will be administered;
(E) How the school district or other entity will provide special education  and related
services for eligible youths with disabilities who  have an individualized education program
or will provide necessary accommodations and plans  for eligible youths who qualify under
section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. 794);
(F) How the school district or other entity will ensure that eligible youths receive  ap-
propriate in-person guidance or support; and
(G) How the school district or other entity will  record and report performance measures
for purposes of accountability, including longitudinal monitoring of student progress  and
post-secondary education and employment readiness.
(7) The Department of Education and Youth  Development Division shall provide technical
assistance to school districts and other eligible entities choosing to  provide youth reengage-
ment programs.
(8)(a) The Youth Development  Council shall coordinate with the State Board of Education
to adopt rules under this section.
(b) When adopting  rules under this section, the board and the council shall consult with
post-secondary institutions of  education and community-based organizations that have pre-
viously offered youth reengagement programs, providers of online courses and programs and
education service districts.
(9) Nothing  in this section affects the authority of a school district or other entity to
directly offer youth reengagement  programs or other educational services for eligible youths.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 417.847, as amended by section 63, chapter  774, Oregon Laws 2015, and
section 36, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
417.847. (1) The Youth Development Council is established.
(2) The council is established for the purpose of overseeing a unified system that provides  ser-
vices to school-age children  through youth 24 years of age in a manner that supports educational
success, focuses on crime prevention,  reduces high risk behaviors and is integrated, measurable and
accountable. The council shall provide direction to the Youth Development Division.
(3) The council consists of no fewer than  15 members who are appointed by the Governor. The
Governor  shall  ensure that membership of the council satisfies any federal requirements for mem-
bership of a state advisory committee  on juvenile justice, and shall include tribal representation in
the membership of the council.
(4) The council shall:
(a) Determine the availability of funding  to support community-based youth development pro-
grams, services  and initiatives with demonstrated outcomes and strategic objectives established by
the council by rule.
(b) Prioritize funding for services related to:
(A) The prevention of and intervention in the risk factors that  lead to juvenile delinquency and
the promotion of protective factors that improve the health and well-being  of children and youth,
as supported by evidence-based program models and other research-based models; and
(B) The prevention of and intervention in gang violence and gang involvement.
(c) Administer and coordinate the statewide youth reengagement system described in
section 33 of this 2019 Act.
(5) The council may:
(a) Enter into performance-based intergovernmental agreements  with regional and county enti-
ties, and tribal governments, to  contract for the provision of youth development programs, services
and initiatives that will achieve demonstrated outcomes  and strategic objectives established by the
council by rule.
(b) Determine the means by which services to children and youth may be provided  effectively
and efficiently across multiple programs to improve the academic and social outcomes of children
and youth.
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 20
(c) Assess state programs and services related to youth development and training,  and identify
methods by which programs and services may be coordinated or consolidated.
(d) Establish  common academic and social indicators to support attainment of goals established
by the council.
(e) Establish common program outcome measurements and coordinate data collection  across
multiple programs and services.
(f) Ensure implementation of best practices that:
(A) Are evidence based;
(B) Are culturally, gender and age appropriate;
(C) Address individual risk factors;
(D) Build upon factors that improve the health and well-being of children and youth; and
(E) Include tribal best practices.
(6) The Governor may designate one member of the council to serve as the chairperson or, if
the Governor chooses not to designate a chairperson, the council may elect one of its members  to
serve as chairperson.
(7) In  accordance with applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183, the council may adopt rules
necessary for the administration of the laws that the council is charged with administering.
SECTION 35.
Section 33 of this  2019 Act and the amendments to ORS 417.847 by section
34 of this 2019 Act become operative on July 1, 2020.
STATEWIDE SCHOOL SAFETY AND PREVENTION SYSTEM
SECTION 36. Statewide School Safety and Prevention System. (1) As used in this  section:
(a) “Cyberbullying” has the meaning given that term in ORS 339.351.
(b) “Harassment, intimidation  or bullying” has the meaning given that term in ORS
339.351.
(c) “Suicidal behavior” includes:
(A) Self-directed, injurious behavior with an intent to die as a result of the behavior;
(B) Nonfatal, self-directed, potentially injurious behavior with an intent to die as a result
of the behavior that may not result in injury; or
(C) Thinking about, considering or planning suicide.
(d) “Violence”  means aggressive behavior with the intention to cause, or an outcome that
poses a risk of causing, serious or lethal injury.
(2) The Department of Education shall  establish and maintain the Statewide School
Safety and Prevention System.
(3) The system required under this section shall consist of the following:
(a) Assistance to school districts and education service districts in decreasing acts of
harassment, intimidation or bullying and acts of cyberbullying through the implementation
of effective prevention programs that:
(A) Incorporate evidenced-based, multitiered practices; and
(B) Support resiliency building and trauma-informed care practices.
(b) Assistance to school districts and  education service districts in decreasing youth su-
icidal behavior through the implementation of effective prevention programs and  student
wellness programs that focus on early identification and intervention  by school safety and
prevention specialists, as described in subsection (4) of this section, who:
(A) Provide training, outreach and technical assistance related  to youth suicidal behavior
prevention and wellness;
(B) Support coordination between schools  and health agencies, including public and pri-
vate behavioral health providers; and
(C) Support school districts and education service districts in the establishment of sui-
cidal behavior prevention programs.
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 21
(c) Assistance to school districts and education service  districts in implementing a
multidisciplinary student safety assessment system to identify, assess and  support students
who present a potential risk for violence to others. Multidisciplinary school safety  assess-
ment teams shall be made available to assist each school  district and education service dis-
trict in assessing students who are engaged in violence or who are posing a threat of violence
to others. The teams shall:
(A) Assess potential danger and identify circumstances and risk  factors that may in-
crease risk for potential violence;
(B) Develop management and intervention plans  in collaboration with community part-
ners; and
(C) Connect students and families to community resources and supports.
(d) Promotion and  use of the statewide school safety tip line established by ORS 339.329.
School safety and prevention specialists, as described in subsection (4) of this section, shall
work collaboratively with the Oregon State Police to support school districts and education
service districts in accessing and implementing the school safety tip line.
(4) The system required under this section shall be supported  by school safety and pre-
vention specialists who:
(a) Serve regions of this state;
(b) Are cross-trained in safety assessments and in the prevention  of youth suicide, of
acts of bullying, intimidation or harassment and of acts of cyberbullying; and
(c) Provide or facilitate  training, the development of programs and plans, the coordi-
nation of local teams and the provision of ongoing consultation to regional  partners, school
districts and education service districts.
(5) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the Oregon Health Authority  and
other representatives of school districts,  education service districts, school employees, hu-
man services, mental health professionals  and law enforcement agencies, shall adopt rules
related to the system required under this section.
SECTION 37.
(1) Section 36 of this 2019 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2020.
(2) Notwithstanding the operative date set forth in subsection  (1) of this section, the
Department of Education may take any action before the operative date  set forth in sub-
section (1) of this section that is necessary for the department to exercise, on and after  the
operative date set forth in subsection (1) of this section,  all of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the department by section 36 of this 2019 Act.
STATEWIDE EQUITY INITIATIVES
SECTION 38. (1) As used  in this section, “plan student” means a student enrolled in early
childhood through post-secondary education who:
(a) Is an American Indian or Alaskan Native; and
(b) Has experienced disproportionate results in  education due to historical practices, as
identified by the State Board of Education by rule.
(2)(a) The Department of Education  shall develop and implement a statewide education
plan for plan students.
(b) When developing the  plan, the department shall consult with representatives from
tribal governments and from executive branch agencies  who have formed government-to-
government relations to focus on education. Additionally, the department may  receive input
from an advisory group consisting of community members, education stakeholders  and rep-
resentatives of the Early Learning Division, the  Youth Development Division and the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission.
(c) The department shall be responsible for:
(A) Implementing the plan developed under this subsection;
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 22
(B) Developing eligibility criteria,  the applicant selection process and expectations for
recipients of grant awards described in this section; and
(C) Advising the State Board of Education on the adoption of rules under this section.
(3) The plan developed under this section must address:
(a) The disparities experienced by  plan students in every indicator of academic success,
as documented by the department’s  statewide report card and other relevant reports related
to plan students;
(b) The historical practices leading to disproportionate outcomes for plan students; and
(c) The educational needs of plan students from early childhood through post-secondary
education as determined by examining culturally appropriate best practices  in this state and
across the nation.
(4) The plan developed and implemented under this section must provide strategies to:
(a) Address the disproportionate  rate of disciplinary incidents involving plan students as
compared to all students in the education system;
(b) Increase parental engagement in the education of plan students;
(c) Increase the engagement of plan  students in educational activities before and after
regular school hours;
(d) Increase early childhood education and kindergarten readiness for plan students;
(e) Improve literacy  and numeracy levels among plan students between kindergarten and
grade three;
(f) Support plan student transitions to middle school and  through the middle school and
high school grades to maintain and improve academic performance;
(g) Support culturally responsive pedagogy and practices from early  childhood through
post-secondary education;
(h) Support the development of culturally responsive  curricula from early childhood
through post-secondary education;
(i) Increase attendance of plan students in early childhood  programs through post-
secondary and professional certification programs; and
(j) Increase attendance of plan students in four-year post-secondary institutions of edu-
cation.
(5) The department shall submit a biennial report concerning the progress of  the plan
developed and implemented under this section to a committee of the  Legislative Assembly
related to  education at each even-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
(6) The department, in consultation with the advisory group, shall award grants to early
learning hubs, providers  of early learning services, school districts, education service dis-
tricts, post-secondary institutions of education, tribal governments  and community-based
organizations to implement  the strategies provided in the plan developed and implemented
under this section.
(7) To qualify for and receive grants described in this section,  an applicant must identify
and demonstrate that the  applicant meets the eligibility criteria adopted by the State Board
of Education by rule.
SECTION 39.
(1) As used  in this section, “plan student” means a student enrolled in early
childhood through post-secondary education who:
(a) Is Latino or Hispanic, including individuals of Mexican, Cuban, Puerto Rican, South
American, Central American or Spanish descent; and
(b) Has experienced disproportionate results in education  due to historical practices, as
identified by the State Board of Education by rule.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall develop and  implement a statewide education
plan for plan students.
(b) The department shall form an advisory group consisting of individuals representing:
(A) Urban and rural communities;
(B) Indigenous and immigrant populations;
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 23
(C) English language learners;
(D) Individuals with disabilities;
(E) Parents and students;
(F) Youth who are lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer or another minority gender
or sexual orientation;
(G) Community-based organizations serving Latino or Hispanic youth and families; and
(H) Education stakeholders, including representatives of the Early Learning  Division, the
Youth Development Division and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(c) The advisory group formed as provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection shall advise
the department regarding:
(A) Development and implementation of the plan;
(B) Eligibility criteria, applicant selection  processes and expectations for recipients of
grant awards described in this section; and
(C) Adoption of rules by the  State Board of Education for the implementation of the plan.
(3) The plan developed under this section must address:
(a) The disparities experienced by plan students in every  indicator of academic success,
as documented by the department’s  statewide report card and other relevant reports related
to plan students;
(b) The historical practices leading to disproportionate outcomes for plan students; and
(c) The educational needs of plan students from early childhood through post-secondary
education as determined by examining culturally appropriate best practices  in this state and
across the nation.
(4) The plan developed and implemented under this section must provide strategies to:
(a) Address the disproportionate rate of disciplinary incidents involving plan students
compared to all students in the education system;
(b) Increase parental engagement in the education of plan students;
(c) Increase the engagement of plan students in  educational activities before and after
regular school hours;
(d) Increase early childhood education and kindergarten readiness for plan students;
(e) Improve literacy  and numeracy levels among plan students between kindergarten and
grade three;
(f) Support plan student transitions to  middle school and through the middle school and
high school grades to maintain and improve academic performance;
(g) Support culturally  responsive pedagogy and practices from early childhood through
post-secondary education;
(h) Support the development of  culturally responsive curricula from early childhood
through post-secondary education;
(i) Increase attendance of plan students in community colleges  and professional certif-
ication programs; and
(j) Increase attendance of plan students in four-year post-secondary institutions of edu-
cation.
(5) The department  shall submit a biennial report concerning the progress of the plan
developed and implemented under this section to a committee of the Legislative Assembly
related to  education at each even-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
(6) The department, in consultation with the advisory group, shall award grants to early
learning hubs, providers of early learning services,  school districts, post-secondary insti-
tutions of education and community-based organizations to implement the  strategies pro-
vided in the plan developed and implemented under this section.
(7) To qualify for and receive a grant described in this section,  an applicant must identify
and demonstrate that the applicant meets the eligibility criteria established  by the State
Board of Education by rule.
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 24
SECTION 40. The Department of Education shall submit  a report concerning the devel-
opment of the statewide education plans under sections 38 and 39 of this 2019 Act to an  in-
terim committee of the Legislative  Assembly related to education no later than January 1,
2021.
SECTION 41. Notwithstanding section 39  of this 2019 Act, the Department of Education
may not do any of the following prior to July 1, 2020:
(1) Implement the statewide education plans developed under section 39 of this 2019 Act,
including awarding any grants to implement the plans; or
(2) Make any  expenditures from any appropriations made to the department for the im-
plementation of the plans developed under section 39 of this 2019 Act.
SUMMER PROGRAMS FOR TITLE I SCHOOLS
SECTION 42. Section 43 of  this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 43. (1) In addition to those moneys distributed through  the State School Fund,
the Department of Education shall make grants to improve student achievement in schools
that:
(a) Are considered high poverty under Title I of the federal Elementary and  Secondary
Education Act of 1965;
(b) The department has identified as having a significant achievement  gap between his-
torically underserved students groups and other student groups pursuant to standards
adopted by the State Board of Education; and
(c) The department has identified as needing additional supports  and interventions based
on:
(A) Criteria used by the Department of  Education to measure the performance of the
schools; and
(B) The schools’ performance ranking compared to similar schools.
(2) The department shall identify schools  to receive grants as provided in this section and
shall notify the identified  schools of the schools’ eligibility to receive grants as provided in
this section.
(3) Moneys received by a school under this section must be  used to provide instructional
time during a summer program.  The summer program must provide at least 60 hours of di-
rect academic  instruction by a teacher licensed under ORS 342.125 or by an instructional
assistant, as defined in ORS 342.120.
(4) The  State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the administration
of this section.
SECTION 44.
Notwithstanding section 43 of this 2019 Act,  the Department of Education
may not award any grants  as provided under section 43 of this 2019 Act prior to July 1, 2020.
EARLY WARNING SYSTEM FOR HIGH SCHOOL GRADUATION
SECTION 45. Section 46 of  this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 46. (1) In addition to those moneys distributed through  the State School Fund,
the Department of Education  shall award grants from the Statewide Education Initiatives
Account to school districts to implement the early warning system described in  this section
that assist students in graduating from high school.
(2)(a) A system funded by  a grant awarded under this section must enable school dis-
tricts, students, students’ families, educators,  school counselors and community organiza-
tions to take necessary corrective actions to  assist students in graduating from high school.
(b) Corrective actions that may be taken must be based  on research on graduation rates
and on reports of individual students related to:
(A) The student’s attendance;
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 25
(B) The student’s behavior at school;
(C) The student’s academic or skill progress; and
(D) Any other factors identified by the State Board of Education by rule.
(3) The department shall assist school  districts that may apply for a grant under this
section, that have applied for a grant  under this section or that have received a grant under
this section, as appropriate, by:
(a) Providing technical assistance to school  districts to ensure that the school districts
understand the goals and objectives of the system;
(b) Assisting school districts in developing expertise in assisting  students in graduating
from high school and developing a culture that encourages and assists students in graduating
from high school;
(c) Identifying meaningful predictive indicators of high school graduation;
(d) Developing local communication systems among students, students’ families, educa-
tors and community organizations to assist students in graduating from high school;
(e) Identifying and developing interventions  at school, at home and in the community to
meet students’ needs; and
(f) Reviewing existing policies and practices to:
(A) Expand policies and practices that encourage high school graduation; and
(B) Eliminate or modify policies and  practices that may provide a disincentive to gradu-
ate from high school.
(4) The amount of  each grant awarded under this section shall equal the school district’s
ADM as defined in ORS 327.006 
×  $3.
(5) The State Board of Education shall  adopt any rules necessary for the administration
of the grants described in this section.
SECTION 47. Section 46 of this 2019 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2020.
EDUCATOR PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT
SECTION 48. (1) The Department of Education and the Educator Advancement  Council,
in consultation with the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission, the  Higher Education
Coordinating Commission and representatives of school districts and other education
stakeholders, shall develop a plan to provide an effective combination of programs  and initi-
atives for the professional development of educators  from kindergarten through grade 12 and
to be funded by the Statewide Education Initiatives Account. The  plan shall be based on
consideration of increasing:
(a) Educator retention;
(b) Educator diversity;
(c) Mentoring and coaching of educators;
(d) Participation in educator preparation programs; and
(e) Educator scholarships.
(2) The department shall provide a report, and may include recommendations for legis-
lation, to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related  to education no later
than January 15, 2020.
SECTION 49.
Section 48 of this 2019 Act is repealed on June 30, 2020.
EARLY LEARNING ACCOUNT
SECTION 50. Sections 51 and 52 of this 2019 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 327.
SECTION 51. Early Learning Account.  (1) The Early Learning Account is established
within the Fund for Student Success.
(2) The Early Learning Account shall consist of:
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 26
(a) Moneys transferred from the  Fund for Student Success under section 2 of this 2019
Act;
(b) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the  account by the Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Amounts donated to the account; and
(d) Other amounts deposited into the account from any source.
(3) The Department of Education, on behalf of the  State of Oregon, may solicit and ac-
cept gifts, grants,  donations and other moneys from public and private sources for the Early
Learning Account.  Moneys received as provided in this subsection shall be deposited into the
Early Learning Account.
(4) Moneys in the Early Learning Account are continuously appropriated to the  Depart-
ment of Education for early learning programs as described in section 52 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 52.
Early Learning Account uses.  (1) The Department of Education and the
Early Learning Division shall use moneys in  the Early Learning Account to provide funding
for early learning programs in a manner  consistent with a statewide early learning system
plan overseen by the Early Learning Council. Early learning  programs that may receive
moneys from the Early Learning Account include:
(a) Early childhood special education or early intervention services, as provided by ORS
343.475;
(b) Relief nurseries;
(c) Programs funded by the Early Childhood Equity Fund;
(d) The Oregon prekindergarten program and other  public preschool programs estab-
lished under ORS 329.170 to 329.200, by increasing:
(A) The total number of spaces for children served by the programs; or
(B) Existing spaces for full-day programs from half-day programs;
(e) Professional development for early childhood educators; and
(f) Early Head Start programs.
(2) In addition to the uses identified in subsection (1) of this  section, moneys in the Early
Learning Account may be  used for staffing needs of the Early Learning Division for the
purpose of implementing this section.
(3) The State  Board of Education and the Early Learning Council shall adopt rules nec-
essary for the distribution of moneys under this section.
EARLY CHILDHOOD EQUITY FUND
SECTION 53.
Early Childhood Equity Fund.  (1) The Early Childhood Equity Fund  is es-
tablished in the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. Moneys in the
Early Childhood Equity Fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Education
for the Early Learning  Division to make grants under section 54 of this 2019 Act to culturally
specific early  learning, early childhood and parent support programs and to promote the ca-
pacity of culturally specific organizations to deliver these programs.
(2) The fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated or  otherwise transferred to the fund from the Legislative As-
sembly;
(b) Earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(c) Other amounts deposited into the fund from any source.
SECTION 54.
Early childhood support grant program.  (1) The Early Learning Division
may make grants from the Early Childhood Equity Fund  established under section 53 of this
2019 Act to culturally specific early learning, early childhood and parent  support programs
in this  state that build capacity in communities, ensure children start kindergarten ready
to succeed and support families to be stable, healthy and attached. For purposes of this
subsection, a program is in this state if the program serves communities within  the ge-
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 27
ographic boundaries of this state, including communities within Indian country of a  federally
recognized Oregon Indian tribe that is within the geographic boundaries of this state.
(2) To receive a grant under this section, a program must:
(a) Provide outreach, support  and resources to children and families who are at risk be-
cause of any combination of two or more factors, including their race,  ethnicity, English
language proficiency, socioeconomic status and geographic location; and
(b) Demonstrate a proven ability to provide outreach,  support and resources to children
and families described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3) The  division shall monitor capacity needs and provide technical assistance to
grantees.
(4) The division shall conduct  a biennial evaluation of programs that receive grants under
this section. The evaluation shall include measurement of outcomes that align with:
(a) Current research regarding  positive child and family indicators, including family sta-
bility and early childhood school readiness; and
(b) Culturally specific approaches.
(5) The Early Learning Council, in consultation with the division,  shall adopt rules nec-
essary to carry out the provisions of this section. The  rules shall include requirements for
grant eligibility under this section.
(6) On or before September 15 of each odd-numbered year,  the division shall submit to
the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to early childhood  and child
welfare a report on the status and impact of grants made to programs under  this section.
The report shall include changes in the capacity of culturally specific  organizations and the
results of any biennial evaluations conducted  in accordance with subsection (4) of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 55.
 ORS 417.790 is amended to read:
417.790. The Early Learning Division shall:
(1) Make grants to fund research-based services and initiatives to improve outcomes  for chil-
dren, youth or families.
(2) Make Great Start grants  to fund community-based programs for children zero through six
years of age. A recipient shall  use Great Start grant funds to provide research-based early childhood
programs in community settings and to provide services that have proven to be successful and  that
meet the needs of the community. These services  shall be provided in accordance with ORS 417.728.
(3) Make grants under section 54 of this 2019  Act to fund culturally specific early learn-
ing, early childhood and parent support programs that build capacity in communities to
provide culturally appropriate services to ensure children  start kindergarten ready to suc-
ceed and to support family stability.
PERSONAL INCOME TAX RATES
SECTION 56.
 ORS 316.037 is amended to read:
316.037. (1)(a) A tax is imposed for each taxable  year on the entire taxable income of every
resident of this state. The amount of the tax shall be determined in accordance with the  following
table:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
If taxable income is: The tax is:
Not over $2,000  [ 5% ] 4.75% of
taxable
income
Over $2,000 but not
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 28
over $5,000  [ $100] $95 plus [ 7% ] 6.75%
of the excess
over $2,000
Over $5,000 but not
over $125,000  [ $310] $298 plus [ 9% ] 8.75%
of the excess
over $5,000
Over $125,000  [ $11,110] $10,798 plus 9.9%
of the excess
over $125,000
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(b) For  tax years beginning in each calendar year, the Department of Revenue shall adopt a
table that shall apply in lieu of the table contained in paragraph (a) of this subsection, as follows:
(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (D) of this  paragraph, the minimum and maximum dollar
amounts for each bracket for which a tax is imposed shall be increased by the  cost-of-living adjust-
ment for the calendar year.
(B) The rate applicable to any rate bracket as adjusted under subparagraph  (A) of this para-
graph [ shall] may  not be changed.
(C) The amounts setting forth the tax, to the extent necessary to reflect the adjustments in  the
rate brackets, shall be adjusted.
(D) The rate brackets applicable to taxable income in excess of $125,000 may not be adjusted.
(c) For purposes of paragraph (b) of this subsection, the cost-of-living adjustment  for any calen-
dar year is the percentage (if any) by  which the monthly averaged U.S. City Average Consumer
Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending August 31 of the prior calendar year exceeds  the
monthly averaged index for the second quarter of the calendar year 1992.
(d) As used  in this subsection, “U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index” means the U.S. City
Average Consumer Price Index for All Urban  Consumers (All Items) as published by the Bureau of
Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(e) If any increase  determined under paragraph (b) of this subsection is not a multiple of $50,
the increase shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of $50.
(2) A tax is imposed for each  taxable year upon the entire taxable income of every part-year
resident of this state. The amount of the tax shall be computed under  subsection (1) of this section
as if the part-year resident were a full-year resident and shall be  multiplied by the ratio provided
under ORS 316.117 to determine the tax on income derived from sources within this state.
(3) A tax is imposed for each taxable year on the taxable income of every full-year  nonresident
that is derived from sources  within this state. The amount of the tax shall be determined in ac-
cordance with the table set forth in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 57.
The amendments to ORS 316.037 by section 56 of this 2019 Act  apply to tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2020.
CORPORATE ACTIVITY TAX
SECTION 58. Definitions. As used in sections 58 to 76 of this 2019 Act:
(1)(a) “Commercial activity” means the total  amount realized by a person, arising from
transactions and activity in the regular course  of the person’s trade or business, without
deduction for expenses incurred by the trade or business.
(b) “Commercial activity” does not include:
(A) Interest income except interest on credit sales;
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 29
(B) Receipts from  the sale, exchange or other disposition of an asset described in section
1221 or 1231 of the Internal Revenue Code, without regard to the length of time  the person
held the asset;
(C) Proceeds  received attributable to the repayment, maturity or redemption of the
principal of a loan, bond, mutual fund, certificate of deposit or marketable instrument;
(D) The principal amount received  under a repurchase agreement or on account of any
transaction properly characterized as a loan to the person;
(E) Contributions received by a trust, plan or  other arrangement, any of which is de-
scribed in section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, or to which title  26, subtitle A,
chapter 1, subchapter (D) of the Internal Revenue Code applies;
(F) Proceeds received from the issuance of  the taxpayer’s own stock, options, warrants,
puts or calls, or from the sale of the taxpayer’s treasury stock;
(G) Proceeds received on the account  of payments from insurance policies, except those
proceeds received for the loss of business revenue;
(H) Gifts or charitable contributions received, membership dues received by trade,  pro-
fessional, homeowners’ or condominium associations,  payments received for educational
courses, meetings or meals, or similar payments to a  trade, professional or other similar
association, and fundraising receipts received by any person when any excess receipts  are
donated or used exclusively for charitable purposes;
(I) Damages received as the result of litigation in excess of  amounts that, if received
without litigation, would be treated as commercial activity;
(J) Property, money and other amounts received or acquired by an agent on  behalf of
another in excess of the agent’s commission, fee or other remuneration;
(K) Tax refunds, other tax benefit recoveries and reimbursements for the tax  imposed
under sections 58 to 76 of this 2019 Act made by entities that are part  of the same unitary
group as provided under section 60 of this  2019 Act, and reimbursements made by entities
that are not members of a unitary group that are required to be made for  economic parity
among multiple owners of an entity whose tax obligation under sections 58 to  76 of this 2019
Act is required to be reported and paid entirely by one owner, as provided in section 60  of
this 2019 Act;
(L) Pension reversions;
(M) Contributions to capital;
(N) Receipts from the sale, transfer, exchange or other  disposition of motor vehicle fuel
or any other product used for the propulsion of motor vehicles;
(O) In the case of receipts from the sale of cigarettes or tobacco products by a  wholesale
dealer, retail dealer, distributor, manufacturer or seller, an amount equal to  the federal and
state excise taxes paid by any person  on or for such cigarettes or tobacco products under
subtitle E of the Internal Revenue Code or ORS chapter 323;
(P) In the case of receipts from the sale of malt beverages, wine or alcoholic  liquor, all
as defined in ORS 471.001, or cider, as defined in ORS 471.023, by a person holding a  license
issued under ORS chapter 471, an  amount equal to the federal and state excise taxes paid
by any person on or for such malt beverages, wine or alcoholic liquor under subtitle E of  the
Internal Revenue Code or  ORS chapter 471, and any net amount paid to the Oregon Liquor
Control Commission by a person licensed to sell alcoholic liquor under  ORS chapter 471 in
excess of the purchase price paid by the licensee;
(Q) In the case of receipts from the sale of marijuana  items, as defined in ORS 475B.015,
by a person holding a license issued  under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545, an amount equal to the
federal and state excise taxes paid by any person on or for such marijuana  items under
subtitle E of the Internal Revenue Code or ORS 475B.700 to 475B.760;
(R) Receipts realized by a vehicle dealer certified under ORS 822.020 from the sale or
other transfer of a motor vehicle, as defined in  ORS 801.360, to another vehicle dealer for the
purpose of resale by the transferee vehicle dealer, but only if the sale or other transfer was
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 30
based upon  the transferee’s need to meet a specific customer’s preference for a motor ve-
hicle;
(S) Registration fees or taxes collected by a vehicle dealer certified under ORS  822.020
at the sale or other transfer of a motor vehicle, as defined in ORS 801.360, that are  owed to
a third party by the purchaser  of the motor vehicle and passed to the third party by the
dealer;
(T) Receipts from a financial institution for services provided to the financial  institution
in connection with the issuance,  processing, servicing and management of loans or credit
accounts, if the financial institution and the recipient  of the receipts have at least 50 percent
of their ownership interests  owned or controlled, directly or constructively through related
interests, by common owners;
(U) In the case of amounts retained  as commissions by a holder of a license under ORS
chapter 462, an  amount equal to the amounts specified under ORS chapter 462 that must be
paid to or collected by the Department of Revenue as  a tax and the amounts specified under
ORS chapter 462 to be used as purse money;
(V) Net revenue of residential care facilities as defined in ORS 443.400 or in-home  care
agencies as defined in ORS  443.305, to the extent that the revenue is derived from or received
as compensation for providing services to a medical assistance or Medicare recipient;
(W) Dividends received;
(X) Distributive income received from a pass-through entity;
(Y) Receipts from sales to a wholesaler in this state, if the seller receives  certification
at the time of sale from the wholesaler that  the wholesaler will sell the purchased property
outside this state;
(Z) Rebates paid to purchasers by retailers or wholesalers;
(AA) Receipts from the wholesale or retail sale of groceries;
(BB) Receipts from transactions among members of a unitary group;
(CC) Moneys, including  public purpose charge moneys collected under ORS 757.612 and
costs of funding or implementing cost-effective energy conservation  measures collected un-
der ORS 757.689, that are collected from customers, passed to a  utility and approved by the
Public Utility Commission and that support energy conservation, renewable resource  acqui-
sition and low-income assistance programs;
(DD) Moneys collected by a utility from customers  for the payment of loans through
on-bill financing;
(EE) Surcharges collected under ORS 757.736;
(FF) Moneys passed to a utility by the  Bonneville Power Administration for the purpose
of effectuating the Regional Power Act Exchange credits or pursuant to any settlement  as-
sociated with the exchange credit;
(GG) Moneys collected by a utility for franchise fees, privilege  taxes, federal taxes, local
taxes and fees payable under ORS 756.310;
(HH) Charges paid to the Residential Service Protection Fund required by  chapter 290,
Oregon Laws 1987;
(II) Universal service surcharge moneys collected  by telecommunications carriers and
paid into the universal service fund established in ORS 759.425;
(JJ) Moneys collected for public purpose funding as described in ORS 759.430;
(KK) Moneys collected for the federal universal service fund  as determined by the Fed-
eral Communications Commission;
(LL) In the case of a seller or provider of  telecommunications services, the amount of
tax imposed under ORS 403.200 for access  to the emergency communications system that is
collected from subscribers or consumers;
(MM) In the case of a transient lodging tax collector, the amount of tax imposed  under
ORS 320.305 and of  any local transient lodging tax imposed upon the occupancy of transit
lodging;
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 31
(NN) In the case of a  seller of bicycles, the amount of tax imposed under ORS 320.415
upon retail sales of bicycles;
(OO) In the case of a qualified heavy equipment provider, the amount of tax  imposed
under section 2, chapter 64, Oregon Laws 2018, upon the rental price of heavy equipment;
(PP) Receipts representing business done with or for members of an  agricultural coop-
erative in this state that is a cooperative organization described in section 1381 of  the
Internal Revenue Code; and
(QQ) Revenue received by a business entity that is mandated  by contract or subcontract
to be distributed to another person or  entity if the revenue constitutes sales commissions
that are paid to a  person who is not an employee of the business entity, including, without
limitation, a split-fee real estate commission.
(2)(a) “Commercial activity of a financial institution” includes all items  of income with-
out deduction for expenses.
(b) If the reporting person for a financial  institution is a holding company, “commercial
activity of a financial institution” includes all items of income reported on the FR Y-9  filed
by the holding company.
(c) If the  reporting person for a financial institution is a bank organization, “commercial
activity of a financial institution” includes all items of income reported on the  call report
filed by the bank organization.
(d) If the reporting person for a financial institution  is a nonbank financial organization,
“commercial activity of a financial institution” includes all  items of income reported in ac-
cordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
(3) “Commercial activity of an insurer” includes all  items of income without deduction
for expenses and all items of  income reported on the statement of income accompanying the
annual statement required under ORS  731.574 to be filed with the Director of the Department
of Consumer and Business Services.
(4) “Cost inputs” means the cost of goods sold as calculated under section 471 of the
Internal Revenue Code.
(5) “Doing  business” means engaging in any activity, whether legal or illegal, that is
conducted for, or results in, the receipt of commercial activity at any  time during a calendar
year.
(6) “Excluded person” means any of the following:
(a) Organizations described in sections 501(c) and  501(j) of the Internal Revenue Code,
unless the exemption is denied under section 501(h), (i) or (m) or under section  502, 503 or
505 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(b) Organizations described in  section 501(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, unless the
exemption is denied under section 502 or 503 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(c) Organizations described in section 501(e) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(d) Organizations described in section 501(f) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(e) Charitable risk pools described in section 501(n) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(f) Organizations described in section 521 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(g) Qualified state tuition programs described in  section 529 of the Internal Revenue
Code.
(h) Foreign or alien insurance companies, but only with respect to the underwriting
profit derived from writing wet  marine and transportation insurance subject to tax under
ORS 731.824 and 731.828.
(i) Governmental entities.
(j) Any person with commercial activity that does not exceed $1 million for  the calendar
year, other than a person  that is part of a unitary group as provided in section 60 of this 2019
Act with commercial activity in excess of $1 million.
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 32
(k) Hospitals subject to assessment under section 2, chapter  736, Oregon Laws 2003, long
term care facilities  subject to assessment under section 16, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003,
or any entity subject to assessment under section 3, 5 or 9, chapter 538, Oregon Laws 2017.
(7) “Financial institution” has the meaning given  that term in ORS 314.610, except that
“financial institution” does not include a credit union.
(8)(a) “FR Y-9” means  the consolidated or parent-only financial statements that a holding
company is required to file with the Federal Reserve Board pursuant to 12 U.S.C. 1844.
(b) In  the case of a holding company required to file both consolidated and parent-only
financial statements, “FR Y-9” means the consolidated  financial statements that the holding
company is required to file.
(9) “Governmental entity” means:
(a) The United States and any of its unincorporated agencies and instrumentalities.
(b) Any incorporated agency or instrumentality of the United States wholly owned by  the
United States or by a corporation wholly owned by the United States.
(c) The State of Oregon and any of its unincorporated agencies and instrumentalities.
(d) Any county, city, district or other political subdivision of the state.
(e) Any public corporation.
(f) A federally recognized Indian tribe.
(10) “Groceries” means food as defined in 7 U.S.C. 2012(k).
(11) “Insurer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 317.010.
(12) “Internal Revenue Code,” except where the Legislative Assembly has provided  oth-
erwise, refers to the laws of the United States  or to the Internal Revenue Code as they are
amended and in effect on December 31, 2018.
(13) “Labor costs” means total compensation of  all employees, not to include compen-
sation paid to any single employee in excess of $500,000.
(14)(a) “Motor vehicle  fuel or any other product used for the propulsion of motor
vehicles” means:
(A) Motor vehicle fuel as defined in ORS 319.010; and
(B) Fuel the use of which in a motor vehicle is subject to taxation under ORS 319.530.
(b) “Motor vehicle fuel or  any other product used for the propulsion of motor vehicles”
does not mean:
(A) Electricity; or
(B) Electric batteries or any other mechanical or physical component  or accessory of a
motor vehicle.
(15) “Person”  includes individuals, combinations of individuals of any form, receivers,
assignees, trustees in bankruptcy, firms,  companies, joint-stock companies, business trusts,
estates, partnerships, limited liability partnerships, limited liability  companies, associations,
joint ventures, clubs, societies, entities organized  as for-profit corporations under ORS
chapter 60, C  corporations, S corporations, qualified subchapter S subsidiaries, qualified
subchapter S trusts,  trusts, entities that are disregarded for federal income tax purposes and
any other entities.
(16) “Retailer” means a person doing business by selling tangible personal property to a
purchaser for a purpose other than:
(a) Resale by the purchaser of the property as tangible  personal property in the regular
course of business;
(b) Incorporation by the purchaser of the property in  the course of regular business as
an ingredient or component of real or personal property; or
(c) Consumption by the purchaser  of the property in the production for sale of a new
article of tangible personal property.
(17) “Taxable commercial activity” means commercial activity sourced  to this state un-
der section 66 of this 2019 Act, less any subtraction pursuant to section 64 of this 2019 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 33
(18)(a) “Taxpayer” means any person or unitary group required to register,  file or pay
tax under sections 58 to 76 of this 2019 Act.
(b) “Taxpayer” does not include excluded persons.
(19)(a) “Unitary  business” means a business enterprise in which there exists directly or
indirectly between the members or  parts of the enterprise a sharing or exchange of value
as demonstrated by:
(A) Centralized management or a common executive force;
(B) Centralized administrative services or functions resulting in economies of scale; or
(C) Flow of goods, capital resources or services demonstrating functional integration.
(b) “Unitary business” may include a business enterprise the activities of which:
(A) Are in the same general line of business, such as manufacturing,  wholesaling or re-
tailing; or
(B) Constitute steps in a vertically integrated  process, such as the steps involved in the
production of natural  resources, which might include exploration, mining, refining and mar-
keting.
(20) “Unitary group” means a group of persons with  more than 50 percent common
ownership, either direct or indirect, that is  engaged in business activities that constitute a
unitary business.
(21) “Wholesaler”  means a person primarily doing business by merchant distribution of
tangible personal property to retailers or to other wholesalers.
SECTION 59.
Accounting methods.  A taxpayer’s method of  accounting for commercial
activity, cost inputs and labor costs for  a tax year shall be the same as the taxpayer’s
method of accounting for federal income tax purposes for the taxpayer’s  federal tax year
that includes the tax year. If a taxpayer’s method of accounting for federal income  tax pur-
poses changes, the taxpayer’s method  of accounting for commercial activity under sections
58 to 76 of this 2019 Act shall be changed accordingly.
SECTION 60. Unitary groups. A unitary  group shall register, file and pay taxes under
sections 58 to 76 of this 2019 Act as  a single taxpayer and may exclude receipts from trans-
actions among its members.  The Department of Revenue may collect identifying information
about all members of  a unitary group and may require disclosure to the department, for each
member, of the commercial activity in Oregon and in the United States.
SECTION 61. Taxation of property transferred into state.  (1) Except as provided in sub-
section (2) of this section:
(a) A person shall  include as taxable commercial activity the value of property the person
transfers into this state  for the person’s own use in the course of a trade or business within
one year after the person receives the property outside this state; and
(b) In the case of a unitary group, the taxpayer shall include as taxable commercial  ac-
tivity the value of property that  any of the taxpayer’s members transferred into this state
for the use in the course of a trade or business by any of the  taxpayer’s members within one
year after the taxpayer receives the property outside this state.
(2) Property brought into  this state within one year after it is received outside this state
by a person or unitary  group described in subsection (1) of this section may not be included
as taxable commercial activity as required under subsection (1) of this section if the De-
partment of Revenue ascertains that the property’s receipt  outside this state by the person
or unitary group followed by its transfer into this state within one year was not intended  in
whole or in part to avoid in whole or in part the tax imposed under sections 58 to 76  of this
2019 Act.
(3) The department may adopt rules necessary to administer this section.
SECTION 62.
Joint and several liability.  All members  of a unitary group during the tax
year or periods for which additional tax, penalty  or interest is owed are jointly and severally
liable for such amounts. Although the reporting  person shall be assessed for the liability,
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 34
amounts due may be collected  by assessment against any member of the unitary group or
pursued against any member of the unitary group.
SECTION 63. Corporate activity tax imposed on commercial activity.  (1) A corporate ac-
tivity tax is imposed on each person  with taxable commercial activity for the privilege of
doing business in this state. The tax is imposed upon persons with  substantial nexus with
this state. The tax imposed under this section is not a  transactional tax and is not subject
to the  Interstate Income Act of 1959 (P.L. 86-272). The tax imposed under this section is in
addition to any other taxes or fees imposed under the tax laws  of this state. The tax imposed
under this section is imposed  on the person receiving the commercial activity and is not a
tax imposed directly on a purchaser. The tax imposed under this  section is an annual privi-
lege tax for the calendar year and shall be remitted  quarterly to the Department of Revenue.
A taxpayer is subject to  the annual corporate activity tax for doing business during any
portion of such calendar year.
(2) A person has substantial nexus with  this state if any of the following applies. The
person:
(a) Owns or uses a part or all of its capital in this state.
(b) Holds a certificate of existence or authorization issued  by the Secretary of State au-
thorizing the person to do business in this state.
(c) Has bright-line presence in this state.
(d) Otherwise has nexus with this state to an extent that  the person can be required to
remit the tax imposed under sections 58 to 76 of this 2019 Act under the United States  Con-
stitution.
(3) A person has bright-line presence in this state  for the calendar year if any of the
following applies. The person:
(a) Owns at any time during the calendar year property in this state with an  aggregate
value of at least $50,000. For purposes of this paragraph, owned property  is valued at original
cost and rented property is valued at eight times the net annual rental charge.
(b) Has during the calendar year payroll  in this state of at least $50,000. Payroll in this
state includes the following:
(A) Any amount subject to withholding by the person under ORS 316.167 and 316.172;
(B) Any other amount the person pays as compensation to an  individual under the
supervision or control of the person for work done in this state; and
(C) Any amount  the person pays for services performed in this state on the person’s
behalf by another.
(c) Has during the calendar year commercial activity, sourced to this state under  section
66 of this 2019 Act, of at least $750,000.
(d) Has at any time during the calendar year within this state at  least 25 percent of the
person’s total property, total payroll or total commercial activity.
(e) Is a resident of this state or  is domiciled in this state for corporate, commercial or
other business purposes.
SECTION 64.
Subtraction. (1) A taxpayer shall subtract from commercial activity sourced
to this state 35 percent of the greater of the following amounts paid or incurred by the tax-
payer in the tax year:
(a) The amount of cost inputs; or
(b) The taxpayer’s labor costs.
(2) The amounts in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section shall be apportioned  to this
state in the manner required for apportionment of income under ORS 314.605 to 314.675.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the subtraction  under this section may
not exceed 95 percent of the taxpayer’s commercial activity in this state.
SECTION 65.
Rate of taxation.  (1)  The corporate activity tax imposed under section 63
of this 2019 Act for each calendar year shall equal  $250 plus the product of the taxpayer’s
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 35
taxable commercial activity  in excess of $1 million for the calendar year multiplied by 0.57
percent.
(2) A tax  is not owed under this section if the person’s taxable commercial activity does
not exceed $1 million.
SECTION 66. Sourcing of commercial activity.  (1) For purposes of sections 58 to 76 of this
2019 Act, commercial  activity other than commercial activity of financial institutions or
insurers shall be sourced to this state as follows:
(a) In the case of the sale, rental, lease or license of real property, if and to the  extent
the property is located in this state.
(b) In the case of the rental, lease or license of tangible personal property,  if and to the
extent the property is located in this state.
(c) In the case of the sale of tangible personal property, if and to the extent the  property
is delivered to a purchaser in this state.
(d) In the case of the sale of a service, if and to the  extent the service is delivered to a
location in this state.
(e) In the case of the sale, rental, lease or license of intangible property, if  and to the
extent the property is used in this state. If the receipts are not based on the amount of  use
of the property, but rather on the right to  use the property, and the payor has the right to
use the property in this state, the  receipts shall be sourced to this state to the extent the
receipts are based on the right to use the property in this state.
(2) If the sourcing provisions of subsection (1) of this section do not fairly represent the
extent of a person’s commercial activity attributable to this state, the person  may request,
or the  Department of Revenue may require or permit, an alternative method. A request
under this subsection by a person must  be made within the statute of limitations applicable
to sections 58 to 76 of this 2019 Act.
(3) The department may adopt rules to provide additional guidance to the  application of
this section, and to provide alternative methods  of sourcing commercial activity that apply
to financial institutions and to insurers, and to any other persons, or a subset  of persons,
that are engaged in similar business or trade activities.
LOCAL TAX PREEMPTION
SECTION 67. Local taxes preempted.  (1) Except as expressly authorized by this section,
the authority to impose, in this state,  a tax upon the commercial activity of an entity is
vested solely in the Legislative Assembly.  A city, county, district or other political subdivi-
sion or municipal corporation of this state may  not impose, by ordinance or other law, a tax
upon commercial activity or upon receipts from grocery sales.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply:
(a) To any tax, or to subsequent amendments of the provisions of  any tax, if the ordi-
nance or other law imposing the tax is in effect and operative on April  1, 2019, or is adopted
by initiative or referendum petition at an election held prior to March 1, 2019; or
(b) To the imposition of franchise fees or franchise taxes.
REGISTRATION PROCEDURES
SECTION 68.
Registration. (1)  Any person or unitary group with commercial activity in
excess of $750,000 in the tax year shall register with the Department of Revenue.
(2) The department by rule may establish the  information pertaining to the person or
unitary group that must be submitted to the department accompanying the  registration and
the time and manner for issuance of registrations under this section.
(3) The department may  impose a penalty for failing to register as required under this
section, not to exceed $100 per month that a person or unitary group  has failed to register
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 36
or a total of $1,000 in a calendar year. The penalty under this subsection may  be imposed not
earlier than 30 days after the date on which the commercial activity  of the person or unitary
group exceeds $750,000 for the tax year.
SECTION 69. Records. Every person  doing business in this state shall keep records, re-
ceipts, invoices and other pertinent papers related to the  corporate activity tax imposed
under section 63 of this 2019 Act in a form required by the Department of Revenue.
RETURNS AND PAYMENTS
SECTION 70. Returns, payment.  (1) For purposes of the corporate activity tax  imposed
under section 63 of this 2019 Act, every person doing business in this state with commercial
activity for the tax year in excess of $1  million shall file not later than April 15 of the fol-
lowing year an annual return. The return must be filed with the  Department of Revenue in
a form prescribed by the department.
(2) The corporate activity tax imposed under section 63 of this 2019 Act is due and pay-
able to the department on or before the last  day of January, April, July and October of each
year for the previous calendar quarter.
(3) The department may by rule extend the time for making any return for good cause.
If the time for  filing a return is extended at the request of a taxpayer, interest on any unpaid
tax at the rate  established under ORS 305.220 from the time the return was originally re-
quired to be filed to the time of payment, shall be added and paid.
SECTION 71.
Accounting, installment  payment.  (1) Subject to rules adopted by the De-
partment of Revenue, the corporate activity tax imposed under section  63 of this 2019 Act
becomes payable in accordance with the system of accounting regularly employed  by the
taxpayer.
(2) In the  case of a lease, contract, sale or arrangement described in section 4216(c) of
the Internal Revenue Code, rules similar to the rules of  section 4217(e)(2) of the Internal
Revenue Code shall apply for purposes of the corporate activity tax.
(3) A person is entitled to a  credit or refund for taxes previously paid on debts that are
deductible under section 166 of the Internal Revenue Code.
COLLECTION
SECTION 72. Rules, uniformity.  The  Department of Revenue is authorized to and shall
adopt rules  requiring uniformity in application, reporting and collection and otherwise car-
rying out the purposes of sections 58 to 76 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 73. Quitting business, successor.  (1) For purposes of sections 58 to 76 of  this
2019 Act, “successor” means any person  to whom another person quitting, selling out, ex-
changing or disposing of a business sells or otherwise conveys,  directly or indirectly, in bulk
and not in the ordinary course of business, a major part of the materials,  supplies, mer-
chandise, inventory, fixtures or  equipment of the person. Any person obligated to fulfill the
terms of a contract shall be  considered a successor to any contractor defaulting in the per-
formance of any contract as to which the person is a surety or guarantor.
(2) If any person quits business or sells out, exchanges or  otherwise disposes of a busi-
ness or stock of goods, any corporate  activity tax imposed under section 63 of this 2019 Act
shall become immediately due and payable. The person shall, within 45 days after the sale,
exchange or disposition, make a return and pay the tax due.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 314.835, the successor is liable for the full amount  of the tax
and may withhold from the purchase price a sum  sufficient to pay any tax due until a receipt
or evidence from the Department of Revenue showing payment in full of any tax due is pre-
sented to the successor. If a receipt or other evidence is not presented  to the successor
within 45 days, the successor may pay the  tax and the amount paid shall, to the extent paid,
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 37
be considered a payment of the purchase price. If the tax paid by the successor is greater
than the purchase price, the amount of the difference is a debt due to the successor from
the seller or transferor.
(4) A successor is not  liable for any tax due from the person from whom the successor
has acquired a business or stock of goods if the successor gives written notice to the de-
partment of the acquisition and the department does not assess a deficiency  against the
seller or transferor within 18 months of receipt of the notice of acquisition and mail or  de-
liver a copy of the assessment to the successor.
APPLICABILITY OF TAX LAWS
SECTION 74.
Except as otherwise provided in sections 58 to 76 of this  2019 Act or where
the context requires otherwise:
(1) The provisions of ORS chapters 305 and 314 as to the audit  and examination of re-
turns, periods of limitation, determination  of and notices of deficiencies, assessments, col-
lections, liens, delinquencies, claims for refund  and refunds, conferences, appeals to the
Oregon Tax Court, stays of collection pending appeal, confidentiality  of returns and the
penalties relative thereto, and the procedures relating thereto,  apply to the determinations
of taxes, penalties and interest under sections 58 to 76 of this 2019 Act.
(2) Any term that is  not defined in section 58 of this 2019 Act shall have the meaning
given that term for the purposes of ORS chapter 305, 314, 316 or 317.
DISPOSITION OF PROCEEDS
SECTION 75. Payments to Department of Revenue.  For purposes of sections 58 to 76 of
this 2019 Act, and except as otherwise provided by law, all taxes, interest and penalties im-
posed and all amounts of corporate activity  tax collected or required to be paid to the state
shall be paid to  the Department of Revenue and upon receipt by the department shall be
turned over to the State Treasurer, to be  disbursed as provided in section 76 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 76.
Suspense account, other  disposition. (1) Except as otherwise provided by
law, all moneys received  by the Department of Revenue under sections 58 to 76 of this 2019
Act shall be deposited in the State Treasury and  credited to a suspense account established
under ORS 293.445 separate and distinct  from the General Fund. The department may pay
expenses for the administration, collection and  enforcement of the tax imposed under
sections 58 to 76 of this 2019  Act out of moneys received from the corporate activity tax
imposed under section 63 of this 2019  Act. Refunds, including refunds of erroneous overpay-
ments or refunds of other moneys received in which the department has no legal  interest,
shall be paid out of the suspense account.
(2) After payment of refunds, the net revenue shall be transferred to the Fund for Stu-
dent Success established under section 2 of  this 2019 Act. A working balance of unreceipted
revenue from the tax  imposed under sections 58 to 76 of this 2019 Act may be retained by
the department for the payment  of refunds, but such working balance may not at the close
of any fiscal year exceed the amount of $500,000.
(3) There are continuously appropriated to the department amounts necessary to pay  the
administrative expenses of the department in  administering, collecting and enforcing the
corporate activity tax imposed under section 63 of this 2019 Act.
UNDERPAYMENT OR UNDERREPORTING
SECTION 77. Interest and penalties.  (1) The Department of Revenue may not impose any
interest or penalty that would otherwise apply to taxes due  if the interest or penalty is based
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 38
on underpayment or underreporting that results solely from the operation of sections 58 to
76 of this 2019 Act.
(2) A taxpayer shall pay at least 80 percent of the balance due for any quarter or  the
department may impose a penalty as provided in ORS 314.400 (3).
SECTION 78. Section 77 of this 2019 Act applies to tax years beginning on or after  Jan-
uary 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2021, and to returns filed on or before April 15, 2021.
APPLICABILITY
SECTION 79. Sections 58 to 76 of this 2019 Act apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2020.
PARTS NOT SEVERABLE
SECTION 80. It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that each part of this  2019 Act
be considered as essentially and inseparably connected with and dependent  upon every other
part. The Legislative Assembly does not intend that any part of  this 2019 Act be the law if
any other part does not become law.
REPORT FROM DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
SECTION 81. No later than February 1, 2020, the Department of  Education shall provide
a report, and may include recommendations  for legislation, to an interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly related to education regarding  the progress of implementing this 2019
Act.
SECTION 82. Section 81 of this 2019 Act is repealed on December 31, 2020.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 83. The unit and section captions used in this 2019 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law  of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2019 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 84. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 39
Passed by House May 1, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 13, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3427 (HB 3427-A) Page 40